Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.04.525

Washington award for vocational excellence—Establishment—Purposes.

The Washington award for vocational excellence program is established. The purposes of this annual program are to:

(1) Maximize public awareness of the achievements, leadership ability, and community contributions of the students enrolled in occupational training programs in high schools, community colleges, and technical colleges;

(2) Emphasize the dignity of work in our society;

(3) Instill respect for those who become skilled in crafts and technology;

(4) Recognize the value of vocational education and its contribution to the economy of this state;

(5) Foster business, labor, and community involvement in vocational-technical training programs and in this award program; and

(6) Recognize the outstanding achievements of up to three vocational or technical students, at least two of whom should be graduating high school students, in each legislative district. Students who have completed at least one year of a vocational-technical program in a community college or public technical college may also be recognized.

[ 1995 1st sp.s. c 7 s 2; 1987 c 231 s 3; 1984 c 267 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1995 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 28C.04.520.

Effective date—1987 c 231 s 3: "Section 3 of this act shall take effect January 1, 1988." [ 1987 c 231 s 6.]